Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1446XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1446XD (2) 91
sc/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 35A.5, subsection 14, paragraphs a and c,
Code 2025, are amended to read as follows:
a. Information related to compliance with the training
requirements under section 35B.6 during the previous calendar
fiscal year.
c. The number of hours of veterans’ services provided by
each county commission of veteran affairs executive director or
administrator during the previous calendar fiscal year.
Sec. 2. Section 35B.6, subsection 1, paragraph c,
subparagraphs (1) and (2), Code 2025, are amended to read as
follows:
(1) Upon the employment of an executive director or
administrator, the executive director or administrator shall
complete a course for the purpose of obtaining certification as
directed by the commandant of the Iowa department of veterans
affairs, training as federally required for the person’s
position, and a personal identification verification card
necessary to access the veterans benefits management system.
If an executive director or administrator fails to obtain
certification or a personal identification verification card
within one year of being employed, the executive director
or administrator shall be removed from office. Upon a
request from a county commission of veteran affairs and based
on extenuating circumstances, the commandant of the Iowa
department of veterans affairs may extend the time frame for
an executive director or administrator to obtain a personal
identification verification card.
(2) An executive director or administrator shall satisfy
the continuing education requirements established by the
national association of county veterans service officers
commandant of the Iowa department of veterans affairs and the
United States department of veterans affairs. Failure of an
executive director or administrator to maintain certification
shall be cause for removal from office. The expenses of
training the executive director or administrator shall be paid
LSB 1446XD (2) 91
-1- sc/js 1/2

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
from the appropriation authorized in section 35B.14.